Illinois, session 104th, SB809.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Executive Reorganization Implementation Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 15/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1801)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Executive Reorganization Implementation Act".9(Source: P.A. 81-984.)